Utah statutes.
41-6a-905.   Vehicle or pedestrian working upon highway -- Right-of-way.

The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to an:

(1)  authorized vehicle or pedestrian actually engaged in work on a highway within a highway construction or maintenance area indicated by a traffic-control device; or

(2) authorized vehicle obviously and actually engaged in work on a highway when the vehicle displays lights in accordance with Section 41-6a-1617.

